ca/dictionaries/ca-valencia.dic
abalisar/01
abissar/03
abrinar/02
acalinar/02
acanissar/03
acarnissar/03
acoquinar/02
adobassar/04
adoctrinar/02
adomassar/04
adormissar/03
aferrissar/03
afinar/02
agallinar/02
agelatinar/02
aglutinar/02
agrisar/01
aguisar/01
aguissar/03
aixafinar/02
alambinar/02
alfarrassar/04
allargassar/04
allisar/01
almoinar/02
alzinar/02
al·lucinar/02
amainar/02
amaitinar/02
amarinar/02
amassar/04
amatinar/02
amotinar/02
anisar/01
apadrinar/02
apalissar/03
apallissar/03
apassar/04
apequinar/02
apergaminar/02
apoquinar/02
aporrinar/02
aquissar/03
arrabassar/04
arramassar/04
arrapissar/03
arremolinar/02
arreveixinar/02
arrissar/03
arrossinar/02
assassinar/02
ataquinar/02
atonyinar/02
atrotinar/02
autodenominar/02
autodeterminar/02
automarginar/02
avinar/02
avisar/01
barrinar/02
bobinar/02
borinar/02
botzinar/02
brunzinar/02
burinar/02
burxinar/02
calcinar/02
caminar/02
capissar/03
capmassar/04
carinar/02
clenxinar/02
cognominar/02
combinar/02
comissar/03
comminar/02
compaginar/02
compassar/04
concassar/04
confinar/02
conglutinar/02
conjuminar/02
contaminar/02
contraminar/02
contraopinar/02
contrapassar/04
coordinar/02
croquisar/01
cuirassar/04
culminar/02
dalinar/02
damasquinar/02
declinar/02
decomissar/03
deixuplinar/02
denominar/02
depassar/04
desafinar/02
desaminar/02
desarrissar/03
desboscassar/04
desbrinar/02
descaminar/02
descamisar/01
desclassar/04
descompassar/04
descontaminar/02
descoordinar/02
desembarassar/04
desembardissar/03
desembassar/04
desembeinar/02
desemmetzinar/02
desempolainar/02
desemportinar/02
desempostissar/03
desencabassar/04
desencabotinar/02
desencalcinar/02
desencaminar/02
desencarranquinar/02
desencaterinar/02
desencisar/01
desencofinar/02
desencoixinar/02
desencortinar/02
desencrostissar/03
desenfardissar/03
desenferrissar/03
desenllardissar/03
desenllepissar/03
desentapissar/03
desenteranyinar/02
desenvalisar/01
desenverinar/02
desenvernissar/03
desespinar/02
desesportinar/02
desfeinar/02
desguassar/04
desinclinar/02
desllavassar/04
desllepissar/03
deslligassar/04
desminar/02
desnassar/04
despassar/04
despentinar/02
desplisar/01
despodassar/04
desprisar/01
desrissar/03
dessaginar/02
desteixinar/02
desteranyinar/02
destinar/02
destrompassar/04
desvalisar/01
determinar/02
dextrinar/02
dictaminar/02
difuminar/02
disciplinar/02
discriminar/02
disseminar/02
divisar/01
dominar/02
efeminar/02
eguinar/02
eliminar/02
embacinar/02
embadinar/02
embarassar/04
embardissar/03
embarranquinar/02
embassar/04
embeinar/02
emblanquinar/02
emborrassar/04
embotinar/02
embronquinar/02
embuinar/02
emmanisar/01
emmerdissar/03
emmetzinar/02
emmolinar/02
emmordassar/04
empallissar/03
empassar/04
empastissar/03
empinar/02
empisar/01
emplomissar/03
empolainar/02
empolsinar/02
emportinar/02
empostissar/03
empotinar/02
encabassar/04
encalcinar/02
encaminar/02
encamisar/01
encanyissar/03
encarabassinar/02
encarranquinar/02
encaterinar/02
encisar/01
encofinar/02
encoixinar/02
encortinar/02
encrostissar/03
encuirassar/04
endevinar/02
endomassar/04
enfardissar/03
enfarinar/02
enferrissar/03
enfigassar/04
engallinar/02
engassar/04
engavatxinar/02
engominar/02
engreixinar/02
enguerxinar/02
enjardinar/02
enjogassar/04
enllardissar/03
enllepissar/03
enreveixinar/02
enrevenxinar/02
enrossinar/02
enrovinar/02
enrubinar/02
ensaginar/02
ensardinar/02
ensetinar/02
ensobinar/02
entapissar/03
enteixinar/02
enteranyinar/02
entinar/02
entonyinar/02
entrelligassar/04
envalisar/01
enverinar/02
envernissar/03
envinar/02
enxisar/01
esbadinar/02
esbardissar/03
esbocinar/02
esboscassar/04
esbrinar/02
escagarrinar/02
escagassar/04
escainar/02
escamisar/01
escardassar/04
escarrassar/04
escatainar/02
esclafassar/04
esclaquinar/02
esclarissar/03
escopinar/02
escotxinar/02
escridassar/04
escrostissar/03
esfarinar/02
esfilegassar/04
esgarbissar/03
esgardissar/03
esgroguissar/03
esllavissar/03
esmatissar/03
esmerdissar/03
espassar/04
espelagrinar/02
espellissar/03
espicassar/04
espinar/02
esplomissar/03
espodassar/04
espolinar/02
espollinar/02
esportinar/02
esquerdissar/03
estassar/04
esteranyinar/02
estiregassar/04
estorinar/02
estossinar/02
estrompassar/04
evaginar/02
examinar/02
excardinar/02
exsanguinar/02
exterminar/02
fascinar/02
fracassar/04
fulminar/02
garrinar/02
gatinar/02
geminar/02
germinar/02
godinar/02
graminar/02
granissar/03
gratinar/02
guillotinar/02
heterodinar/02
il·luminar/02
imaginar/02
improvisar/01
incardinar/02
inclinar/02
incriminar/02
indisciplinar/02
inseminar/02
insubordinar/02
invaginar/02
irisar/01
laminar/02
malencaminar/02
mandrinar/02
maquinar/02
marginar/02
marinar/02
marroquinar/02
massissar/03
matinar/02
matisar/01
matrassar/04
mestissar/03
molinar/02
morfinar/02
nominar/02
obstinar/02
originar/02
paginar/02
patinar/02
pelegrinar/02
peregrinar/02
pollinar/02
preavisar/01
precisar/01
predestinar/02
predominar/02
preordinar/02
raciocinar/02
ramassar/04
rapissar/03
ratinar/02
reclinar/02
recontaminar/02
redenominar/02
reexaminar/02
reimaginar/02
renyinar/02
repassar/04
requisar/01
ressobinar/02
retroil·luminar/02
reveixinar/02
revisar/01
rondinar/02
saginar/02
sedassar/04
setinar/02
sobrepassar/04
subordinar/02
supervisar/01
tamborinar/02
tamisar/01
tatxolinar/02
televisar/01
terbolinar/02
tirassar/04
torpedinar/02
traspassar/04
trompassar/04
turbinar/02
ultrapassar/04
vaticinar/02
xagrinar/02
